Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-411
Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act, how cited.

Sections 2-411 to 2-417 shall be known and may be cited as the Nitrogen Reduction Incentive Act.

Laws 2024, LB1368, § 1.
December 31, 2029